Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1196.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 459.2. Pain Parity in Medicaid.--(a) In maintaining the uniform Statewide preferred drug list under section 459.1, the department may not disadvantage a non-opioid drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain with any equivalent opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on the uniform Statewide preferred drug list.(b) The department fails to comply with subsection (a) if the department:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) designates a non-opioid drug as a nonpreferred drug if any opioid or narcotic drug is designated as a preferred drug; or(2) establishes more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls, including more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements for a non-opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any opioid or narcotic drug.(c) This section applies:(1) To a non-opioid drug on and after the date on which the non-opioid drug is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain, regardless of whether the drug has been reviewed by the department for inclusion on the uniform Statewide preferred drug list.(2) To a drug authorized for use under a contract between the department and a managed care organization.Section 459.3. Pain Parity in Commercial Insurance.--(a) An insurer may not disadvantage a non-opioid drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain with respect to coverage or cost sharing, relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on the formulary or preferred drug list.(b) An insurer fails to comply with subsection (a) if the insurer:(1) imposes more restrictive coverage criteria on any non-opioid drug than the least restrictive coverage criteria imposed on an opioid or narcotic drug;(2) establishes more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls, including more restrictive or more 20260SB1196PN1440 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements for a non-opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any opioid or narcotic drug; or(3) maintains a formulary or preferred drug list grouped into tiers for the purposes of determining cost sharing, placing any non-opioid drug on a tier that requires a cost-sharing responsibility that exceeds the lowest cost-sharing responsibility required for any opioid or narcotic drug on the formulary.(c) This section applies to a non-opioid drug on and after the date on which the non-opioid drug is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1196PN1440 - 3 - 123456789101112131415